North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 10. Feeding Garbage to Swine.

§ 106-405.1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this Part, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:

“Garbage” means consisting in whole or in part of animal waste resulting from handling, preparing, cooking and consuming food, including the offal from or parts thereof; provided that the Commissioner of Agriculture or his authorized representative is empowered to exempt from this definition the waste resulting from the processing of seafood.

“Person” means the State, any municipality, political subdivision, institution, public or private corporation, individual, partnership, or any other entity.

History.

1953, c. 720, s. 1; 1967, c. 872, s. 1.

§ 106-405.2.
Permit for feeding garbage to swine.

No person shall feed garbage to swine without first securing a permit therefor from the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture or his authorized agent. Such permits shall be issued for a period of one year and shall be renewable on the date of expiration.

No permit shall be issued or renewed for garbage feeding under this Part in any county or other subdivision in which local regulations to prohibit garbage feeding are in effect.

This Part shall not apply to any individual who feeds only his own household garbage to swine: Provided, that any such swine sold or disposed of shall be sold or disposed of in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the State Board of Agriculture.

This Part shall not apply to any person who holds a valid federal permit under the Swine Health Protection Act, P.L. 96-468.

History.

1953, c. 720, s. 2; 1971, c. 566, s. 1; 1981, c. 392.

§ 106-405.3.
Application for permit.

Any person desiring to obtain a permit to feed garbage to swine shall make written application therefor to the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture in accordance with requirements of this Part.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is hereby authorized to collect a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each permit issued to a garbage feeder under the provisions of this Part. The fees provided for in this Part shall be used exclusively for the enforcement of this Part.

No permit fee shall be collected from any federal, State, county, or municipal institution.

History.

1953, c. 720, s. 3; 1967, c. 872, s. 2.

§ 106-405.4.
Revocation of permits.

Upon determination that any person, having a permit issued under this Part or one who has applied for a permit hereunder, has violated or failed to comply with any provisions of this Part, the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture may revoke such permit or refuse to issue a permit to an applicant therefor.

History.

1953, c. 720, s. 4.

§ 106-405.5.
Sanitation.

Premises on which garbage feeding is permitted under this Part must be equipped with feeding platforms constructed of concrete, wood or other impervious material, or troughs of such material of sufficient size to accommodate the swine herd. Premises must be kept free of collections of unused garbage and waste materials. Sanitation, rat and fly control measures must be practiced as a further means of the prevention of the spread of diseases.

History.

1953, c. 720, s. 5.

§ 106-405.6.
Cooking or other treatment.

All garbage, regardless of previous processing, shall, before being fed to swine, be thoroughly heated to at least 212 degrees F. for at least 30 minutes unless treated in some other manner which shall be approved in writing by the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture as being equally effective for the protection of animal and human health.

History.

1953, c. 720, s. 6.

§ 106-405.7.
Inspection and investigation; maintenance of records.

Any authorized representative of the North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture shall have the power to enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property for the purpose of inspecting and investigating conditions relating to the proper treatment of garbage to be fed to swine, sanitation of the premises and health of the animals.

Garbage feeders shall keep a complete permanent record relating to the operation of equipment and their procedure of treating garbage, and also from whom all swine are received and to whom sold for immediate slaughter. Such record is to be available to the Commissioner of Agriculture or his authorized representative.

Any operator, manager or person in charge of a restaurant, cafe, boardinghouse, school, hospital, or other public or private place where food is served to persons other than members of the immediate family or nonpaying guests of such operator, manager, or person in charge, shall not allow or permit garbage to be removed from the premises thereof unless the person removing said garbage is in possession of a valid garbage-feeding permit issued by the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, or unless such person removing said garbage is in possession of a document from the county department of health wherein such garbage is located stating that the person removing said garbage is authorized to dispose of such garbage in a legal manner or unless such person removing said garbage is an employee of a municipality engaged in the regular collection of garbage for said municipality. The name and address or license number of any motor vehicle of any person removing garbage other than under authorization from the county department of health, the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services or a municipality, shall be reported by such operator, manager or person in charge, to the State Veterinarian within five days after the first removal of such garbage is made.

History.

1953, c. 720, s. 7; 1971, c. 566, s. 2; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-405.8.
Enforcement of Part; rules and regulations.

The North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture is hereby charged with the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this Part. The North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture, by and with the consent of the State Board of Agriculture, shall have full power to cooperate with the United States Bureau of Animal Industry in the control and eradication of vesicular exanthema.

The Commissioner of Agriculture, by and with the consent of the State Board of Agriculture, shall have full power to promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations that may hereafter be necessary to carry out the provisions of this Part.

History.

1953, c. 720, s. 8.

§ 106-405.9.
Penalties.

Any person, firm or corporation who shall knowingly violate any provisions set forth in this Part or any rule or regulation duly established by the State Board of Agriculture, or any officer or inspector who shall willfully fail to comply with any provisions of this Part shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Such person, firm, or corporation may be enjoined from continuing such violation.

History.

1953, c. 720, s. 9; 1993, c. 539, s. 777; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§§ 106-405.10 through 106-405.14.

Reserved for future codification purposes.